Maine, session 132, LD1935.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §4700-L, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §115, is amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§4700-L. Penalties Violations
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §4700-L, sub-§1, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. A, §115, is
amended to read:
1. Fine Penalties. A person, company, firm, partnership or corporation who installs,
alters, repairs or replaces a water well, geothermal heat exchange well or pump system
without being licensed as provided in this chapter or in violation of the code of performance
adopted by the commission pursuant to section 4700‑H, subsection 5, except for an
apprentice well driller or an apprentice pump installer as set forth in this chapter, or a
person, firm, partnership or corporation who procures a license as provided in this chapter
wrongfully or by fraud commits a civil violation punishable by a fine of not more than
$1,000 $25,000. Notwithstanding this subsection, a person, company, firm, partnership or
corporation who drills, drives or bores a water well or geothermal heat exchange well
without being licensed as provided in this chapter commits a Class D crime.